src/morphology/affixes/interjections.lexc
!! !!!Interjections

!! The Erzya language interjections...


! ============ !
! Interj lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON INTERJ_
+Interj: K ;

LEXICON Interj-Imp
+Interj+Imprt+ScSg2: ImpK ;
+Interj+Imprt+ScPl2:%>дО1 ImpK ;

LEXICON FORMULAIC_
+Interj+Formulaic: WORD-END ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_
+Interj+Voc: WORD-END ;

LEXICON INTERJ-NEG
+Interj+Neg: # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
